th: สไตล์เรือคายัคล่องแก่ง: ครีกโบ๊ต; ครอสโอเวอร์; ฮาล์ฟสไลซ์; เรือยาว; เพลย์โบ๊ต/ฟรีสไตล์; ริเวอร์รันเนอร์; สลาลม; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Estilo de caiaque de águas bravas: Creekboat; Crossover; Half slice; Longboat; Playboat/freestyle; River runner; Slalom; Outro
vi: Kiểu thuyền kayak vượt thác: Thuyền Creekboat; Thuyền Crossover; Thuyền Half slice; Thuyền dài; Thuyền biểu diễn tự do; Thuyền River runner; Thuyền Slalom; Khác
sv: Typ av forskajak: Creekboat; Crossover; Half slice; Långbåt; Playboat/Freestyle; River runner; Slalom; Övrigt
lt-LT: Sraunaus vandens baidarės stilius: „Creekboat“; „Crossover“; „Half slice“; „Longboat“; „Playboat“ / laisvojo stiliaus; „River runner“; Slalomo; Kita
en: Whitewater kayak style: Creekboat; Crossover; Half slice; Longboat; Playboat/Freestyle; River runner; Slalom; Other
pt-BR: Caiaque de águas bravas estilo: Creekboat; Crossover; Half slice; Longboat; Playboat/Freestyle; River runner; Slalom; Outro
pl: Styl kajaka górskiego: Creekboat; Crossover; Half slice; Longboat; Playboat/Freestyle; River runner; Slalomowy; Inne
tr: Nehir kayağı stili: Creekboat; Crossover; Yarım dilim; Uzun tekne; Playboat/serbest stil; Nehir teknesi; Slalom; Diğer
fr: Type de kayak d’eau vive: Creekboat; Crossover; Half slice; Longboat; Playboat/Freestyle; River runner; Slalom; Autre
ru: Стиль каяка для бурной воды: Крикбот; Кроссовер; Хаф-слайс; Лонгбот; Плейбот/фристайл; Риверраннер; Слаломный; Другое
zh-TW: 激流用皮艇樣式: 溪流艇; 跨界艇; 半切艇; 長艇; 花式艇/自由式; 跑河艇; 激流迴旋艇; 其他
it: Stile del kayak per rapide: Creekboat; Crossover; Half slice; Longboat; Playboat/freestyle; River runner; Slalom; Altro
cs: Styl kajaku na divokou vodu: Creekboat; Crossover; Half slice; Longboat; Playboat/Freestyle; River runner; Slalomový; Jiný
da: Stil for whitewater-kajak: Creekboat; Crossover; Half slice; Longboat; Playboat/freestyle; River runner; Slalom; Andet
sk-SK: Štýl kajaku na divokej vode: Creekboat; Crossover; Half slice; Longboat; Playboat/freestyle; River runner; Slalom; Iné
sl-SI: Stil kajaka za divje vode: Creekboat; Crossover; Half slice; Longboat; Playboat/prosti slog; River runner; Slalom; Drugo
nl: Wildwaterkajak stijl: Creekboat; Crossover; Half slice; Longboat; Playboat/freestyle; River runner; Slalom; Overig
ro-RO: Stilul caiacului pentru ape repezi: Creekboat; Crossover; Half slice; Longboat; Playboat/Freestyle; River runner; Slalom; Altele
hr-HR: Stil kajaka za divlje vode: Creekboat; Crossover; Half slice; Longboat; Playboat / slobodni stil; Za spuštanje rijekama; Slalom; Ostalo
bg-BG: Стил на каяк за бързи води: Крийк лодка (Creekboat); Кросоувър; Халф слайс (Half slice); Дълга лодка (Longboat); Плейбоут/фрийстайл (Playboat); Ривър рънър (River runner); Слалом; Друго
fi: Koskenlaskukajakin tyyli: Creek-kajakki; Crossover; Half slice; Longboat; Playboat/freestyle; River runner; Slalom; Muu
hu: Vadvízi kajak stílusa: Creek kajak; Crossover; Half slice; Hosszú kajak; Playboat / Freestyle; Folyami (River runner); Szlalom; Egyéb
nb: Kajakkstil ved elvepadling: Creekboat; Crossover; Half slice; Langbåt; Lekebåt/freestyle; River runner; Slalåm; Annet
el: Καγιάκ κατάβασης ποταμών: Creekboat; Crossover; Half slice; Longboat; Playboat/Freestyle; River runner; Σλάλομ; Άλλο
ko: 급류 카약 유형: 크리크보트; 크로스오버; 하프 슬라이스; 롱보트; 플레이보트/프리스타일; 리버 러너; 슬라럼; 기타
ja: ホワイトウォーターカヤックスタイル: クリークボート; クロスオーバー; ハーフスライス; ロングボート; プレイボート/フリースタイル; リバーランナー; スラローム; その他
de: Bauart des Wildwasserkajaks: Creekboat; Crossover; Half-Slice; Longboat; Playboat/Freestyle; River Runner; Slalom; Andere
zh-CN: 激流皮划艇风格: 溪流艇; 跨界艇; 半切艇; 长艇; 花式/自由式艇; 跑河艇; 障碍回旋艇; 其他
es: Estilo de kayak de aguas bravas: Kayak para arroyos; Crossover; Half slice; Bote largo; Playboat/freestyle; Kayak de río; Eslalon; Otro